Maine, session 132, LD1427.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §8, sub-§2-A, as amended by PL 2019, c. 113, Pt. C, §57 and
c. 483, §3, is further amended to read:
2-A. A prosecution for a Class A, Class B or Class C crime involving unlawful sexual
contact or gross sexual assault or a prosecution for a Class A or Class B crime involving
aggravated sex trafficking must be commenced within 20 years after it is committed.
This subsection does not apply to a Class D crime enhanced to a Class C crime pursuant to
section 1604, subsection 5, paragraph B.
Sec. 2. Report. The Criminal Law Advisory Commission established by the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 12004-I, subsection 52 shall examine the statutes of
limitation in Title 17-A, section 8 pertaining to sexual offenses committed against both
adult and minor victims, including by examining whether parity exists between the statutes
of limitation established in Title 17-A, section 8, subsection 1, paragraph B and section 8,
subsection 2-A, as well as whether the extended limitation periods established in these
provisions should apply to any other sexual offense crimes in the State. The commission
shall submit a report, including any recommendations, to the Joint Standing Committee on
Judiciary no later than December 15, 2025. The committee may report out legislation
related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Sec. 3. Application. This Act applies to the crime of aggravated sex trafficking
under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 17-A, section 852 committed on or after the
effective date of this Act or for which the prosecution has not yet been barred by the statute
of limitations in force immediately prior to the effective date of this Act.
Page 1 - 132LR0781(04)